Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
358D

HOMELESS
ASSISTANCE ACT

REPEALED. L 1997, c 350, §18.

Note

L 1997, c 190, §6 purports to amend §358D-8.

Cross References

For similar provisions, see chapter 346, part XVII.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next